West Virginia, session 2026, SB312.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Department of Agriculture. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 23, 2025, authorized under the authority of §19-20-6 of this code, modified by the Department of Agriculture to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 21, 2025, relating to the Department of Agriculture (registration forms and tags for registration, taxation, and control of dogs, 61 CSR 01B), is authorized.